Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 35
SURETY BOND ALTERNATIVES

Section

11-35-101. Alternatives to surety bonds permitted - requirements - definition - rules.

The requirement of a surety bond as a condition to licensure or authority to conduct business or perform duties in this state provided in sections 5-16-124 (1), 6-16-104.6, 12-10-717, 23-64-121 (1), 33-4-101 (1), 33-12-104 (1), 35-55-104 (1), 37-91-107 (2) and (3), 38-29-119 (2), 39-21-105, 39-27-104 (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), (2)(e), (2.1)(a), (2.1)(b), (2.1)(c), and (2.5)(b), 39-28-105 (1), 42-6-115 (3), 42-7-301 (6), 44-20-112, 44-20-113, 44-20-114, 44-20-412, and 44-20-413 may be satisfied by a savings account or deposit in or a certificate of deposit issued by a state or national bank doing business in this state or by a savings account or deposit in or a certificate of deposit issued by a state or federal savings and loan association doing business in this state. The savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit must be in the amount specified by statute, if any, and must be assigned to the appropriate state agency for the use of the people of the state of Colorado. The aggregate liability of the bank or savings and loan association must in no event exceed the amount of the deposit. For the purposes of the sections referred to in this section, "bond" includes the savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit authorized by this section.

Each appropriate state agency required to accept such bonds, savings accounts, deposits, or certificates of deposit shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the method of assignment, required period of liability, and such other procedures as may be necessary.

All rules adopted or amended by state agencies pursuant to subsection (2) of this section are subject to section 24-4-103.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 419, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(1) and (3) amended, pp. 786, 791, §§ 15, 36, effective June 5.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 617, § 2, effective April 30; (3) amended, p. 1177, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 621, § 8, effective April 2.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1292, § 1, effective April 21; (1) amended, p. 701, § 4, effective June 10.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 409, § 2, effective March 5; (1) amended, p. 1007, § 2, effective March 26; (1) amended, p. 920, § 6, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 437, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 473, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1394, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1681, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2168, § 8, effective June 2; (1) amended, p. 1863, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1773, § 27, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 260, § 5, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1236, § 4, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1391, § 10, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1630, § 32, effective May 31; (1) amended, p. 2545, § 20, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1091, § 2, effective May 31; (1) amended, p. 1332, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1937, § 16, effective October 1; (1) amended, p. 3, § 3, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1214, § 43, effective January 1, 2002.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1340, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1587, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1850, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 527, § 21, effective April 16; (1) amended, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 346, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1192), ch. 83, p. 232, § 7, effective April 14; (1) amended, (HB 16-1129), ch. 262, p. 1078, § 5, effective August 10; (1) amended, (SB 16-036), ch. 292, p. 1181, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1386, § 11, effective May 25; (1) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1172, § 16, effective August 9; (1) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1202, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 138, § 6, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3463, § 5, effective August 2; (1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1658, § 57, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-091), ch. 28, p. 168, § 3, effective August 10.

11-35-101.5. Irrevocable letter of credit permitted - requirements.

Where there is the requirement of either an irrevocable letter of credit or a bond as a condition to licensure in sections 35-36-216 and 35-36-304 or where an irrevocable letter of credit is permitted as an alternative to a surety bond, evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, as a condition to licensure or authority to conduct business or perform duties in this state, provided in sections 33-4-101 (1), 33-12-104 (1), 35-36-216 (1)(a), 35-36-303 (5), 35-36-304 (1)(a), 37-91-107 (2), and 39-27-104 (2.1)(c), the requirement shall be satisfied by an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a state or national bank or a state or federal savings and loan association doing business in this state. The requirement shall also be satisfied by an irrevocable letter of credit issued by the bank or banks for cooperatives that are organized pursuant to federal statutes and that serve the region in which the state of Colorado is located. Such letter of credit shall be in an amount specified by statute, if any, and shall name the appropriate state agency as beneficiary, in favor of the people of the state of Colorado.

Each appropriate state agency required to accept such irrevocable letters of credit shall define the method of transferability, the required period of liability, and such other procedures as may be necessary.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 473, § 6, effective May 8.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 446, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1394, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2168, § 9, effective June 2.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1391, § 11, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1630, § 33, effective May 31; (1) amended, p. 2545, § 34, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1937, § 17, effective October 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1013, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 347, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) repealed, (HB 13-1034), ch. 5, p. 15, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-225), ch. 262, p. 1245, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 753, § 4, effective June 29.